Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXII Ownership and Conveyance of Property
CHAPTER 385 Uniform Transfers to Minors Act

385.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

385.011.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

385.012.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

385.022

to

385.222

:

“Adult” means an individual who has attained the age of eighteen (18) years;

“Benefit plan” means an employer’s plan for the benefit of an employee or partner;

“Broker” means a person lawfully engaged in the business of effecting transactions in securities or commodities for the person’s own account or for the account of others;

“Conservator” means a person appointed or qualified by a court to act as general, limited, or temporary guardian of a minor’s property or a person legally authorized to perform substantially the same functions;

“Court” means District Court;

“Custodial property” means:

Any interest in property transferred to a custodian under KRS

385.032

to

385.222

; and

The income from and proceeds of that interest in property;

“Custodian” means a person so designated under KRS

385.092

; or a successor or substitute custodian designated under KRS

385.182

;

“Financial institution” means a bank, trust company savings institution or credit union, chartered and supervised under state or federal law;

“Legal representative” means an individual’s personal representative or conservator;

“Member of the minor’s family” means the minor’s parent, step-parent, spouse, grandparent, brother, sister, uncle, or aunt, whether of the whole or half blood or by adoption;

“Minor” means an individual who has not attained the age of eighteen (18) years;

“Person” means an individual, corporation, organization, or other legal entity;

“Personal representative” means an executor, administrator, successor personal representative, or special administrator of a decedent’s estate or a person legally authorized to perform substantially the same functions;

“State” includes any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and any territory or possession subject to the legislative authority of the United States;

“Transfer” means a transaction that creates custodial property under KRS

385.092

;

“Transferor” means a person who makes a transfer under KRS

385.032

to

385.222

;

“Trust company” means a financial institution, corporation, or other legal entity, authorized to exercise general trust powers.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

385.020.
Form of gift. [Repealed.]

385.021.
Manner of making gifts. [Repealed.]

385.022.
Scope and jurisdiction.

KRS

385.012

to

385.222

apply to a transfer that refers to KRS

385.032

to

385.222

in the designation under KRS 385.092(1) by which the transfer is made if at the time of the transfer, the transferor, the minor, or the custodian is a resident of this state or the custodial property is located in this state. The custodianship so created remains subject to KRS

385.032

to 385.222 despite a subsequent change in residence of a transferor, the minor, or the custodian, or the removal of custodial property from this state.

A person designated as custodian under KRS

385.032

to

385.222

is subject to personal jurisdiction in this state with respect to any matter relating to the custodianship.

A transfer that purports to be made and which is valid under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act, or a substantially similar act, of another state is governed by the law of the designated state and may be executed and is enforceable in this state if at the time of the transfer, the transferor, the minor, or the custodian is a resident of the designated state or the custodial property is located in the designated state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 2, effective July 15, 1986.

385.030.
Effect of gift. [Repealed.]

385.031.
Effect of gift. [Repealed.]

385.032.
Nomination of custodian.

A person having the right to designate the recipient of property transferable upon the occurrence of a future event may revocably nominate a custodian to receive the property for a minor beneficiary upon the occurrence of the event by naming the custodian followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for — (name of minor) under the Kentucky Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.” The nomination may name one (1) or more persons as substitute custodians to whom the property must be transferred in the order named, if the first nominated custodian dies before the transfer or is unable, declines, or is ineligible to serve. The nomination may be made in a will, a trust, a deed, an instrument exercising a power of appointment, or in a writing designating a beneficiary of contractual rights which is registered with or delivered to the payor, issuer, or other obligor of the contractual rights.

A custodian nominated under this section must be a person to whom a transfer of property of that kind may be made under KRS 385.092(1).

The nomination of a custodian under this section does not create custodial property until the nominating instrument becomes irrevocable or a transfer to the nominated custodian is completed under KRS

385.092

. Unless the nomination of a custodian has been revoked, upon the occurrence of the future event the custodianship becomes effective and the custodian shall enforce a transfer of the custodial property pursuant to KRS

385.092

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 3, effective July 15, 1986.

385.040.
Custodian’s duties and powers. [Repealed.]

385.041.
Duties and powers of custodian. [Repealed.]

385.042.
Transfer by irrevocable gift or exercise of power of appointment.

A person may make a transfer by irrevocable gift to, or the irrevocable exercise of a power of appointment in favor of, a custodian for the benefit of a minor pursuant to KRS

385.092

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 4, effective July 15, 1986.

385.050.
Custodian’s rights and compensation. [Repealed.]

385.051.
Custodian’s expenses — Compensation — Bond and liabilities. [Repealed.]

385.052.
Transfer authorized by will or trust.

A personal representative or trustee may make an irrevocable transfer pursuant to KRS

385.092

to a custodian for the benefit of a minor as authorized in the governing will or trust.

If the testator or settlor has nominated a custodian under KRS

385.032

to receive the custodial property, the transfer must be made to that person.

If the testator or settlor has not nominated a custodian under KRS

385.032

, or all persons so nominated as custodian die before the transfer or are unable, decline, or are ineligible to serve, the personal representative or the trustee, as the case may be, shall designate the custodian from among those eligible to serve as custodian for property of that kind under KRS 385.092(1).

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 5, effective July 15, 1986.

385.060.
Freedom from duty of inquiry into authorization of purported donor or custodian. [Repealed.]

385.061.
Exemption of third persons from liability. [Repealed.]

385.062.
Other transfer by fiduciary.

Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a personal representative or trustee may make an irrevocable transfer to another adult or trust company as custodian for the benefit of a minor pursuant to KRS

385.092

, in the absence of a will or under a will or trust that does not contain an authorization to do so.

Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a conservator may make an irrevocable transfer to another adult or trust company as custodian for the benefit of the minor pursuant to KRS

385.092

.

A transfer under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may be made only if:

The personal representative, trustee, or conservator considers the transfer to be in the best interest of the minor;

The transfer is not prohibited by or inconsistent with provisions of the applicable will, trust agreement, or other governing instrument; and

The transfer is authorized by the court if it exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in value.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 6, effective July 15, 1986.

385.070.
Successor custodian. [Repealed.]

385.071.
Resignation, death or removal of custodian — Bond — Designation of successor custodian. [Repealed.]

385.072.
Transfer by obligor.

Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a person not subject to KRS

385.052

or

385.062

who holds property of or owes a liquidated debt to a minor not having a conservator may make an irrevocable transfer to a custodian for the benefit of the minor pursuant to KRS

385.092

.

If a person having the right to do so under KRS

385.032

has nominated a custodian under that section to receive the custodial property, the transfer must be made to that person.

If no custodian has been nominated under KRS

385.032

, or all persons so nominated as custodian die before the transfer or are unable, decline, or are ineligible to serve, a transfer under this section may be made to an adult member of the minor’s family or to a trust company unless the property exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in value.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 7, effective July 15, 1986.

385.080.
Requiring custodian to account. [Repealed.]

385.081.
Accounting of custodian. [Repealed.]

385.082.
Receipt for custodial property.

A written acknowledgment of delivery by a custodian constitutes a sufficient receipt and discharge for custodial property transferred to the custodian pursuant to KRS

385.032

to

385.222

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 8, effective July 15, 1986.

385.090.
Construction of chapter. [Repealed.]

385.091.
Construction. [Repealed.]

385.092.
Manner of creating custodial property and effecting transfer — Designation of initial custodian — Control.

Custodial property is created and a transfer is made whenever:

An uncertificated security or a certificated security in registered form is either:

1. Registered in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Kentucky Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”; or

Registered in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _________ (name of minor) under the Kentucky Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”; or

Money is paid or delivered to a broker or financial institution for credit to an account in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Kentucky Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”;

The ownership of a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract is either:

Registered with the issuer in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Kentucky Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”; or

Assigned in a writing delivered to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company whose name in the assignment is followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Kentucky Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”;

An irrevocable exercise of a power of appointment or an irrevocable present right to future payment under a contract is the subject of a written notification delivered to the payor, issuer, or other obligor that the right is transferred to the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, whose name in the notification is followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Kentucky Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”;

An interest in real property is recorded in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Kentucky Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”;

A certificate of title issued by a department or agency of a state or of the United States which evidences title to tangible personal property is either:

Issued in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Kentucky Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”; or

Delivered to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company, endorsed to that person followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Kentucky Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”; or

An interest in any property not described in paragraphs (a) through (f) of this subsection is transferred to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company by a written instrument in substantially the form set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

An instrument in the following form satisfies the requirements of paragraphs (a)2. and (g) of subsection (1) of this section:

A transferor shall place the custodian in control of the custodial property as soon as practicable.

“TRANSFER UNDER THE KENTUCKYUNIFORM TRANSFERS TO MINORS ACT I, (name of transferor or name and representative capacity if a fiduciary) hereby transfer to (name of custodian), as custodian for (name of minor) under the Kentucky Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, the following: (insert a description of the custodial property sufficient to identify it). Dated: (Signature) (name of custodian) acknowledges receipt of the property described above as custodian for the minor named above under the Kentucky Uniform Transfers to Minors Act. Dated: ” (Signature of Custodian)

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 9, effective July 15, 1986.

385.100.
Short title. [Repealed.]

385.101.
Short title. [Repealed.]

385.102.
Single custodianship.

A transfer may be made only for one (1) minor, and only one (1) person may be the custodian. All custodial property held under KRS

385.032

to

385.222

by the same custodian for the benefit of the same minor constitutes a single custodianship.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 182, § 10, effective July 15, 1986.